Texas statutes.
SPECIAL DISTRICT LOCAL LAWS CODE

TITLE 5. TRANSPORTATION

SUBTITLE A. NAVIGATION DISTRICTS AND PORT AUTHORITIES

CHAPTER 5009. GALVESTON COUNTY NAVIGATION DISTRICT NO. 1

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 5009.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Commission" means the board of navigation and canal commissioners of the district.

(2) "District" means the Galveston County Navigation District No. 1.

(3) "Fund" means a promotion and development fund created by the district.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 869 (H.B. 2803), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2019.

Sec. 5009.002. NATURE OF DISTRICT. The district is created under Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 869 (H.B. 2803), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2019.

Sec. 5009.003. LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS. (a) All land and other property in the district benefit from the creation of the district, the carrying out of the purposes for which the district was created, and the acquisition and construction of navigation facilities and improvements to carry out those purposes.

(b) The district is necessary to carry out Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 869 (H.B. 2803), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2019.

SUBCHAPTER B. POWERS AND DUTIES

Sec. 5009.051. LIMITATION ON POWERS AND DUTIES. Notwithstanding any other law, the district, the commission, or officers of the district may not have any power or authority over the appointment, remuneration, operations, or conduct of the branch pilots of the Galveston Bar or the commission of pilots of the Galveston Bar.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 869 (H.B. 2803), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2019.

SUBCHAPTER C. PROMOTION AND DEVELOPMENT FUND

Sec. 5009.101. ESTABLISHMENT OF FUND; DEPOSITS. (a) The district may establish a promotion and development fund.

(b) The district, from time to time, may deposit in the fund a portion of the district's accumulated money, plus an amount each year not to exceed 10 percent of the district's total maintenance and operation taxes, including delinquent taxes, received during a fiscal year.

(c) The commission shall determine the amount to be deposited in the fund.

(d) The money in the fund shall be kept separate from other money and accounts of the district.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 869 (H.B. 2803), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2019.

Sec. 5009.102. USE OF FUND. The fund may be used only for:

(1) the purposes described by Section 60.203, Water Code;

(2) the public purposes of development and diversification of the district's economy; and

(3) joint projects with other political subdivisions or entities, including funding a program of an entity, to carry out the purposes of Subchapter H, Chapter 60, Water Code.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 869 (H.B. 2803), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2019.

Sec. 5009.103. CONTROL OF FUND. The fund is under the exclusive control of the commission, and the commission has full responsibility for auditing, approving, and safeguarding the expenditure of money from the fund.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 869 (H.B. 2803), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2019.